Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [18B.117] SALE OR USE OF PARAQUAT DICHLORIDE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibited sale. new text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2027, a person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute a pesticide containing paraquat dichloride. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited use. new text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2028, a person may not use a pesticide containing paraquat dichloride. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Collection and disposal. new text end new text begin The commissioner must collect and dispose of pesticides prohibited for sale and use in this section pursuant to section 18B.065. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPORT; PARAQUAT DICHLORIDE.new text end new text begin By January 1, 2028, the commissioner of agriculture must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy on the use of paraquat dichloride in the state over time and the status of paraquat dichloride in the pesticide supply chain. new text end